Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF600.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2649YH (3) 91 jm/md H.F. 600 Section 1. Section 331.425, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 The For fiscal years beginning before July 1, 2026, the board 3 may certify an addition to a levy in excess of the amounts 4 otherwise permitted under sections 331.423 and 331.424 if the 5 proposition to certify an addition to a levy has been submitted 6 at a special levy election and received a favorable majority of 7 the votes cast on the proposition. A special levy election is 8 subject to the following: 9 Sec. 2. Section 384.12, subsection 4, unnumbered paragraph 10 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 11 A For fiscal years beginning before July 1, 2026, a tax that 12 exceeds any tax levy limit within this chapter , provided the 13 question has been submitted at a special levy election and 14 received a simple majority of the votes cast on the proposition 15 to authorize the enumerated levy limit to be exceeded for the 16 proposed budget year. 17 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 444.25 Property tax limitations ââ 18 general assembly review. 19 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 20 contrary, for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 21 2026, the maximum levy rate for each specific levy imposed 22 by a governmental subdivision shall not exceed one hundred 23 two percent of the average levy rate per one thousand dollars 24 imposed by the governmental subdivision for such specific levy 25 over the immediately preceding five fiscal years, or the levy 26 rate limitation imposed by another provision of law, whichever 27 is less. 28 2. a. The maximum levy rate in subsection 1 may be exceeded 29 after an election at which sixty percent of those voting on 30 the question of exceeding the maximum levy rate in subsection 31 1 vote in favor of the question. The question of exceeding 32 the levy rate may be submitted at a special election under 33 section 39.2, subsection 4, or the general election. Notice 34 of the question shall be provided by publication at least 35 -1- LSB 2649YH (3) 91 jm/md 1/ 3 H.F. 600 sixty days before the time of the election and shall identify 1 the current levy rate and the proposed levy. The levy rate 2 may be rescinded in the same manner as the vote to exceed the 3 levy rate in this subsection, except the vote in favor of the 4 question shall be fifty percent. 5 b. A vote in favor of the question to exceed the maximum 6 levy rate under subsection 1 shall allow the governmental 7 subdivision to exceed the levy rate limitation for one fiscal 8 year out of the five fiscal years immediately following the 9 approval at election, and after such time the maximum levy 10 rate shall revert to the determination under subsection 1, but 11 excluding the fiscal year for which the levy was increased 12 under this subsection. 13 3. During the Ninety-second General Assembly and during 14 each general assembly thereafter, the legislature shall review 15 this section; however, an enactment to change this section 16 shall require a sixty percent vote of the members elected to 17 each house of the general assembly. 18